Illinois, session 104th, SB3843.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 52d as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/2d)7    Sec. 2d. Marketplace facilitators and marketplace sellers.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Affiliate" means a person that, with respect to another 10person: (i) has a direct or indirect ownership interest of 11more than 5 percent in the other person; or (ii) is related to 12the other person because a third person, or a group of third 13persons who are affiliated with each other as defined in this 14subsection, holds a direct or indirect ownership interest of 15more than 5% in the related person.16    "Marketplace" means a physical or electronic place, forum, 17platform, application, or other method by which a marketplace 18seller sells or offers to sell items. 19    "Marketplace facilitator" means a person who, pursuant to 20an agreement with an unrelated third-party marketplace seller, 21directly or indirectly through one or more affiliates 22facilitates a retail sale by an unrelated third party 23marketplace seller by:   SB3843- 2 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1        (1) listing or advertising for sale by the marketplace 2    seller in a marketplace, tangible personal property that 3    is subject to tax under this Act; and 4        (2) either directly or indirectly, through agreements 5    or arrangements with third parties, collecting payment 6    from the customer and transmitting that payment to the 7    marketplace seller regardless of whether the marketplace 8    facilitator receives compensation or other consideration 9    in exchange for its services. 10    "Marketplace seller" means a person that sells or offers 11to sell tangible personal property through a marketplace 12operated by an unrelated third-party marketplace facilitator.13    (b) Beginning on January 1, 2020 and through December 31, 142025, a marketplace facilitator who meets either of the 15following thresholds is considered the retailer for each sale 16of tangible personal property made through its marketplace:17        (1) the cumulative gross receipts from sales of 18    tangible personal property to purchasers in Illinois by 19    the marketplace facilitator and by marketplace sellers 20    selling through the marketplace are $100,000 or more; or21        (2) the marketplace facilitator and marketplace 22    sellers selling through the marketplace cumulatively enter 23    into 200 or more separate transactions for the sale of 24    tangible personal property to purchasers in Illinois.25    A marketplace facilitator shall determine on a quarterly 26basis, ending on the last day of March, June, September, and   SB3843- 3 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1December, whether the marketplace facilitator meets the 2threshold of either paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection 3(b) for the preceding 12-month period. If the marketplace 4facilitator meets the threshold of either paragraph (1) or (2) 5for a 12-month period, the marketplace facilitator is 6considered a retailer maintaining a place of business in this 7State and is required to collect and remit the tax imposed 8under this Act and file returns for one year. At the end of 9that one-year period, the marketplace facilitator shall 10determine whether the marketplace facilitator met the 11threshold of either paragraph (1) or (2) during the preceding 1212-month period. If the marketplace facilitator met the 13threshold in either paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 1412-month period, the marketplace facilitator is considered a 15retailer maintaining a place of business in this State and is 16required to collect and remit the tax imposed under this Act 17and file returns for the subsequent year. If at the end of a 18one-year period a marketplace facilitator that was required to 19collect and remit the tax imposed under this Act determines 20that the marketplace facilitator did not meet the threshold in 21either paragraph (1) or (2) during the preceding 12-month 22period, the marketplace facilitator shall subsequently 23determine on a quarterly basis, ending on the last day of 24March, June, September, and December, whether the marketplace 25facilitator meets the threshold of either paragraph (1) or (2) 26for the preceding 12-month period.  SB3843- 4 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2026, a marketplace 2facilitator whose cumulative gross receipts from sales of 3tangible personal property to purchasers in Illinois by the 4marketplace facilitator and by marketplace sellers selling 5through the marketplace are $100,000 or more is considered the 6retailer for each sale of tangible personal property made 7through its marketplace.8    A marketplace facilitator shall determine on a quarterly 9basis, ending on the last day of March, June, September, and 10December, whether the marketplace facilitator meets the 11threshold in this subsection (b-5) for the preceding 12-month 12period. If the marketplace facilitator meets the threshold for 13a 12-month period, the marketplace facilitator is considered a 14retailer maintaining a place of business in this State and is 15required to collect and remit the tax imposed under this Act 16and file returns for one year. At the end of the one-year 17period, the marketplace facilitator shall determine whether 18the marketplace facilitator met the threshold during the 19preceding 12-month period. If the marketplace facilitator met 20the threshold for the preceding 12-month period, the 21marketplace facilitator is considered a retailer maintaining a 22place of business in this State and is required to collect and 23remit the tax imposed under this Act and file returns for the 24subsequent year. If at the end of a one-year period a 25marketplace facilitator that was required to collect and remit 26the tax imposed under this Act determines that the marketplace   SB3843- 5 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1facilitator did not meet the threshold during the preceding 212-month period, the marketplace facilitator shall 3subsequently determine on a quarterly basis, ending on the 4last day of March, June, September, and December, whether the 5marketplace facilitator meets the threshold for the preceding 612-month period. 7    (c) Beginning on January 1, 2020 a marketplace facilitator 8considered to be the retailer pursuant to subsection (b) or 9(b-5) of this Section is considered the retailer with respect 10to each sale made through its marketplace and is liable for 11collecting and remitting the tax under this Act on all such 12sales. The marketplace facilitator who is considered to be the 13retailer under subsection (b) or (b-5) for sales made through 14its marketplace has all the rights and duties, and is required 15to comply with the same requirements and procedures, as all 16other retailers maintaining a place of business in this State 17who are registered or who are required to be registered to 18collect and remit the tax imposed by this Act with respect to 19such sales.20    (d) A marketplace facilitator shall:21        (1) certify to each marketplace seller that the 22    marketplace facilitator assumes the rights and duties of a 23    retailer under this Act with respect to sales made by the 24    marketplace seller through the marketplace; and25        (2) collect taxes imposed by this Act as required by 26    Section 3-45 of this Act for sales made through the   SB3843- 6 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1    marketplace.2    (e) A marketplace seller shall retain books and records 3for all sales made through a marketplace in accordance with 4the requirements of Section 11.5    (f) A marketplace seller shall furnish to the marketplace 6facilitator information that is necessary for the marketplace 7facilitator to correctly collect and remit taxes for a retail 8sale. The information may include a certification that an item 9being sold is taxable, not taxable, exempt from taxation, or 10taxable at a specified rate. A marketplace seller shall be 11held harmless for liability for the tax imposed under this Act 12when a marketplace facilitator fails to correctly collect and 13remit tax after having been provided with information by a 14marketplace seller to correctly collect and remit taxes 15imposed under this Act.16    (g) If the marketplace facilitator demonstrates to the 17satisfaction of the Department that its failure to correctly 18collect and remit tax on a retail sale resulted from the 19marketplace facilitator's good faith reliance on incorrect or 20insufficient information provided by a marketplace seller, it 21shall be relieved of liability for the tax on that retail sale. 22In this case, a marketplace seller is liable for any resulting 23tax due.24    (h) (Blank).25    (i) This Section does not affect the tax liability of a 26purchaser under this Act.  SB3843- 7 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1    (j) (Blank).2    (k) A marketplace facilitator required to collect taxes 3imposed under this Section and this Act on retail sales made 4through its marketplace shall be liable to the Department for 5such taxes, except when the marketplace facilitator is 6relieved of the duty to remit such taxes by virtue of having 7paid to the Department taxes imposed by the Retailers' 8Occupation Tax Act upon his or her gross receipts from the same 9transactions. 10    (l) If, for any reason, the Department is prohibited from 11enforcing the marketplace facilitator's duty under this Act to 12collect and remit taxes pursuant to this Section, the duty to 13collect and remit such taxes reverts to the marketplace seller 14that is a retailer maintaining a place of business in this 15State pursuant to Section 2. 16    (m) Nothing in this Section affects the obligation of any 17consumer to remit use tax for any taxable transaction for 18which a certified service provider acting on behalf of a 19remote retailer or a marketplace facilitator does not collect 20and remit the appropriate tax. 21    (n) Notwithstanding any provision of law, the following 22provisions apply regarding a qualified delivery network sale: 23        (1) the Department may audit both the marketplace 24    seller and the delivery network company for the qualified 25    delivery network sale; and 26        (2) for qualified delivery network sales made on or   SB3843- 8 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1    after the effective date of this amendatory act of the 2    104th General Assembly, a delivery network company may, in 3    the form and manner prescribed by the Department, deduct 4    or exclude from its tax liability under this Section the 5    amount of tax under this Act that the delivery network 6    company paid to the marketplace seller in connection with 7    the qualified delivery network sale. 8    The delivery network company may not claim a deduction or 9exclusion under this subsection if the marketplace seller did 10not charge the delivery network company for the tax imposed 11under this Act on the qualified network sale. The amount of the 12deduction or exclusion under this subsection may not exceed 13the amount of tax under this Act that was charged by the 14marketplace seller to the delivery network company in 15connection with the qualified delivery network sale. 16    As used in this subsection, the following terms have the 17following meanings: 18    "Bicycle" has the meaning given to that term in the 19Illinois Vehicle Code. 20    "Delivery network company" means a marketplace facilitator 21that maintains a website, mobile application, or nondigital 22platform used to facilitate delivery services that are 23performed or otherwise conducted by a delivery network 24courier. 25    "Delivery network courier" means an individual who 26provides delivery services through a delivery network company   SB3843- 9 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1by using a personal means of transportation, such as a motor 2vehicle, bicycle, scooter, or other similar mode of 3transportation, or walking. "Delivery network courier" does 4not include a common carrier or a motor carrier. 5    "Delivery services" means the pickup and delivery of 6tangible personal property by a delivery network courier from 7a marketplace seller located in this State to a customer 8located in this State, which may include the selection, 9collection, and purchase of the tangible personal property in 10connection with the delivery. "Delivery services" does not 11include a delivery requiring more than 75 miles of travel from 12the marketplace seller to the customer. 13    "Motor vehicle" has the meaning given to that term in the 14Illinois Vehicle Code. 15    "Qualified delivery network sale" means a sale that meets 16all of the following requirements: (i) the sale is made as part 17of delivery services facilitated by a delivery network 18company, (ii) the sale is sourced to this State under this Act, 19and (iii) the tax imposed by this Act on the sale is paid by 20the delivery network company to the marketplace seller in 21connection with the delivery services. 22(Source: P.A. 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.) 23    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 24Section 2d as follows:   SB3843- 10 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1    (35 ILCS 110/2d)2    Sec. 2d. Marketplace facilitators and marketplace 3servicemen.4    (a) Definitions. For purposes of this Section:5    "Affiliate" means a person that, with respect to another 6person: (i) has a direct or indirect ownership interest of 7more than 5% in the other person; or (ii) is related to the 8other person because a third person, or group of third persons 9who are affiliated with each other as defined in this 10subsection, holds a direct or indirect ownership interest of 11more than 5% in the related person.12    "Marketplace" means a physical or electronic place, forum, 13platform, application, or other method by which a marketplace 14serviceman makes or offers to make sales of service. 15    "Marketplace facilitator" means a person who, pursuant to 16an agreement with an unrelated third-party marketplace 17serviceman, directly or indirectly through one or more 18affiliates facilitates sales of service by that unrelated 19third-party marketplace serviceman through:20        (1) listing or advertising for sale by the marketplace 21    serviceman in a marketplace, sales of service that are 22    subject to tax under this Act; and23        (2) either directly or indirectly, through agreements 24    or arrangements with third parties, collecting payment 25    from the customer and transmitting that payment to the 26    marketplace serviceman regardless of whether the   SB3843- 11 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1    marketplace facilitator receives compensation or other 2    consideration in exchange for its services. 3    "Marketplace serviceman" means a person that makes or 4offers to make a sale of service through a marketplace 5operated by an unrelated third-party marketplace facilitator.6    (b) Beginning January 1, 2020 and through December 31, 72025, a marketplace facilitator who meets either of the 8following thresholds is considered the serviceman for each 9sale of service made through its marketplace:10        (1) the cumulative gross receipts from sales of 11    service to purchasers in Illinois by the marketplace 12    facilitator and by marketplace servicemen selling through 13    the marketplace are $100,000 or more; or14        (2) the marketplace facilitator and marketplace 15    servicemen selling through the marketplace cumulatively 16    enter into 200 or more separate transactions for the sale 17    of service to purchasers in Illinois.18    A marketplace facilitator shall determine on a quarterly 19basis, ending on the last day of March, June, September, and 20December, whether the marketplace facilitator meets the 21threshold of either paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection 22(b) for the preceding 12-month period. If the marketplace 23facilitator meets the threshold of either paragraph (1) or (2) 24for a 12-month period, it is considered a serviceman 25maintaining a place of business in this State and is required 26to collect and remit the tax imposed under this Act and file   SB3843- 12 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1returns for one year. At the end of that one-year period, the 2marketplace facilitator shall determine whether the 3marketplace facilitator met the threshold of either paragraph 4(1) or (2) during the preceding 12-month period. If the 5marketplace facilitator met the threshold in either paragraph 6(1) or (2) for the preceding 12-month period, it is considered 7a serviceman maintaining a place of business in this State and 8is required to collect and remit the tax imposed under this Act 9and file returns for the subsequent year. If, at the end of a 10one-year period, a marketplace facilitator that was required 11to collect and remit the tax imposed under this Act determines 12that it did not meet the threshold in either paragraph (1) or 13(2) during the preceding 12-month period, the marketplace 14facilitator shall subsequently determine on a quarterly basis, 15ending on the last day of March, June, September, and 16December, whether it meets the threshold of either paragraph 17(1) or (2) for the preceding 12-month period.18    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2026, a marketplace 19facilitator whose cumulative gross receipts from sales of 20service to purchasers in Illinois by the marketplace 21facilitator and by marketplace servicemen selling through the 22marketplace are $100,000 or more is engaged in the business of 23making sales of service in Illinois for purposes of this Act 24for each sale of service made through the marketplace.25    A marketplace facilitator shall determine on a quarterly 26basis, ending on the last day of March, June, September, and   SB3843- 13 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1December, whether the marketplace facilitator meets the 2threshold in this subsection (b-5) for the preceding 12-month 3period. If the marketplace facilitator meets the threshold for 4a 12-month period, the marketplace facilitator is considered a 5serviceman maintaining a place of business in this State and 6is required to collect and remit the tax imposed under this Act 7and file returns for one year. At the end of the one-year 8period, the marketplace facilitator shall determine whether 9the marketplace facilitator met the threshold during the 10preceding 12-month period. If the marketplace facilitator met 11the threshold for the preceding 12-month period, the 12marketplace facilitator is considered a serviceman maintaining 13a place of business in this State and is required to collect 14and remit the tax imposed under this Act and file returns for 15the subsequent year. If at the end of a one-year period a 16marketplace facilitator that was required to collect and remit 17the tax imposed under this Act determines that the marketplace 18facilitator did not meet the threshold during the preceding 1912-month period, the marketplace facilitator shall 20subsequently determine on a quarterly basis, ending on the 21last day of March, June, September, and December, whether it 22meets the threshold for the preceding 12-month period. 23    (c) A marketplace facilitator considered to be the 24serviceman pursuant to subsection (b) or, beginning January 1, 252026, subsection (b-5) of this Section is considered the 26serviceman for each sale of service made through its   SB3843- 14 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1marketplace and is liable for collecting and remitting the tax 2under this Act on all such sales. The marketplace facilitator 3has all the rights and duties, and is required to comply with 4the same requirements and procedures, as all other servicemen 5maintaining a place of business in this State who are 6registered or who are required to be registered to collect and 7remit the tax imposed by this Act with respect to such sales.8    (d) A marketplace facilitator shall:9        (1) certify to each marketplace serviceman that the 10    marketplace facilitator assumes the rights and duties of a 11    serviceman under this Act with respect to sales of service 12    made by the marketplace serviceman through the 13    marketplace; and14        (2) collect taxes imposed by this Act as required by 15    Section 3-40 of this Act for sales of service made through 16    the marketplace.17    (e) A marketplace serviceman shall retain books and 18records for all sales of service made through a marketplace in 19accordance with the requirements of Section 11.20    (f) A marketplace serviceman shall furnish to the 21marketplace facilitator information that is necessary for the 22marketplace facilitator to correctly collect and remit taxes 23for a sale of service. Such information includes the cost 24price of any item transferred incident to a sale of service 25under this Act when the cost price of an item exceeds 50% of 26the entire billing to the service customer of a sale of service   SB3843- 15 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1made through the marketplace. The information may include a 2certification that an item transferred incident to a sale of 3service under this Act is taxable, not taxable, exempt from 4taxation, or taxable at a specified rate. A marketplace 5serviceman shall be held harmless for liability for the tax 6imposed under this Act when a marketplace facilitator fails to 7correctly collect and remit tax after having been provided 8with information by a marketplace serviceman to correctly 9collect and remit taxes imposed under this Act.10    (g) If the marketplace facilitator demonstrates to the 11satisfaction of the Department that its failure to correctly 12collect and remit tax on a sale of service resulted from the 13marketplace facilitator's good faith reliance on incorrect or 14insufficient information provided by a marketplace serviceman, 15it shall be relieved of liability for the tax on that sale of 16service. In this case, a marketplace serviceman is liable for 17any resulting tax due.18    (h) (Blank).19    (i) This Section does not affect the tax liability of a 20purchaser under this Act.21    (j) (Blank). 22    (k) A marketplace facilitator required to collect taxes 23imposed under this Section and this Act on sales of service 24made through its marketplace shall be liable to the Department 25for such taxes, except when the marketplace facilitator is 26relieved of the duty to remit such taxes by virtue of having   SB3843- 16 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1paid to the Department taxes imposed by the Service Occupation 2Tax Act from the same transactions.3    (l) If, for any reason, the Department is prohibited from 4enforcing the marketplace facilitator's duty under this Act to 5collect and remit taxes pursuant to this Section, the duty to 6collect and remit such taxes reverts to the marketplace 7serviceman that is a serviceman maintaining a place of 8business in this State pursuant to Section 2.9    (m) Nothing in this Section affects the obligation of any 10consumer to remit service use tax for any taxable transaction 11for which a certified service provider acting on behalf of a 12serviceman maintaining a place of business in this State or a 13marketplace facilitator does not collect and remit the 14appropriate tax. 15    (n) Notwithstanding any provision of law, the following 16provisions apply regarding a qualified delivery network sale: 17        (1) the Department may audit both the marketplace 18    seller and the delivery network company for the qualified 19    delivery network sale; and 20        (2) for qualified delivery network sales made on or 21    after the effective date of this amendatory act of the 22    104th General Assembly, a delivery network company may, in 23    the form and manner prescribed by the Department, deduct 24    or exclude from its tax liability under this Section the 25    amount of tax under this Act that the delivery network 26    company paid to the marketplace seller in connection with   SB3843- 17 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1    the qualified delivery network sale. 2    The delivery network company may not claim a deduction or 3exclusion under this subsection if the marketplace seller did 4not charge the delivery network company for the tax imposed 5under this Act on the qualified network sale. The amount of the 6deduction or exclusion under this subsection may not exceed 7the amount of tax under this Act that was charged by the 8marketplace seller to the delivery network company in 9connection with the qualified delivery network sale. 10    As used in this subsection, the following terms have the 11following meanings: 12    "Bicycle" has the meaning given to that term in the 13Illinois Vehicle Code. 14    "Delivery network company" means a marketplace facilitator 15that maintains a website, mobile application, or nondigital 16platform used to facilitate delivery services that are 17performed or otherwise conducted by a delivery network 18courier. 19    "Delivery network courier" means an individual who 20provides delivery services through a delivery network company 21by using a personal means of transportation, such as a motor 22vehicle, bicycle, scooter, or other similar mode of 23transportation, or walking. "Delivery network courier" does 24not include a common carrier or a motor carrier. 25    "Delivery services" means the pickup and delivery of 26tangible personal property by a delivery network courier from   SB3843- 18 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1a marketplace seller located in this State to a customer 2located in this State, which may include the selection, 3collection, and purchase of the tangible personal property in 4connection with the delivery. "Delivery services" does not 5include a delivery requiring more than 75 miles of travel from 6the marketplace seller to the customer. 7    "Motor vehicle" has the meaning given to that term in the 8Illinois Vehicle Code. 9    "Qualified delivery network sale" means a sale that meets 10all of the following requirements: (i) the sale is made as part 11of delivery services facilitated by a delivery network 12company, (ii) the sale is sourced to this State under this Act, 13and (iii) the tax imposed by this Act on the sale is paid by 14the delivery network company to the marketplace seller in 15connection with the delivery services. 16(Source: P.A. 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.) 17    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 18changing Section 3 as follows: 19    (35 ILCS 115/3)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.103)20    Sec. 3. Tax imposed. 21    (a) A tax is imposed upon all persons engaged in the 22business of making sales of service (referred to as 23"servicemen") on all tangible personal property transferred, 24including, on and after January 1, 2025, transferred by lease,   SB3843- 19 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1as an incident of a sale of service, including computer 2software, and including photographs, negatives, and positives 3that are the product of photoprocessing, but not including 4products of photoprocessing produced for use in motion 5pictures for public commercial exhibition. Beginning January 61, 2001, prepaid telephone calling arrangements shall be 7considered tangible personal property subject to the tax 8imposed under this Act regardless of the form in which those 9arrangements may be embodied, transmitted, or fixed by any 10method now known or hereafter developed. Sales of (1) 11electricity delivered to customers by wire; (2) natural or 12artificial gas that is delivered to customers through pipes, 13pipelines, or mains; and (3) water that is delivered to 14customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains are not subject 15to tax under this Act. The provisions of this amendatory Act of 16the 98th General Assembly are declaratory of existing law as 17to the meaning and scope of this Act. 18    (b) Beginning on January 1, 2026, a serviceman maintaining 19a place of business in this State that makes sales of service 20to Illinois customers from a location or locations outside of 21Illinois is engaged in the business of making sales of service 22in Illinois for the purposes of this Act. A qualifying 23serviceman under this subsection (b) is liable for all 24applicable State and locally imposed service occupation taxes 25administered by the Department on all tangible personal 26property transferred as an incident of a sale of service made   SB3843- 20 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1by the serviceman to Illinois customers from locations outside 2of Illinois.3    (c) A serviceman maintaining a place of business in this 4State that is required to collect taxes imposed under the 5Service Use Tax Act on sales of service made to Illinois 6purchasers shall be liable to the Department for such taxes, 7except when the serviceman maintaining a place of business in 8this State is relieved of the duty to remit such taxes by 9virtue of having paid to the Department taxes imposed by this 10Act in accordance with this Section upon such sales.11    (d) Beginning January 1, 2026, a marketplace facilitator 12whose cumulative gross receipts from sales of service to 13purchasers in Illinois by the marketplace facilitator and by 14marketplace servicemen selling through the marketplace are 15$100,000 or more is engaged in the business of making sales of 16service in Illinois for purposes of this Act for each sale of 17service made through its marketplace.18    A marketplace facilitator who meets the threshold of this 19subsection (d) is required to remit the applicable State 20service occupation taxes under this Act and local service 21occupation taxes administered by the Department on all taxable 22transfers of tangible personal property made incident to sales 23of service by the marketplace facilitator or facilitated for 24marketplace servicemen to customers in this State. A 25marketplace facilitator transferring or facilitating the 26transfer of tangible personal property incident to a sale of   SB3843- 21 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1service to customers in this State is subject to all 2applicable procedures and requirements of this Act.3    The marketplace facilitator shall determine on a quarterly 4basis, ending on the last day of March, June, September, and 5December, whether the marketplace facilitator meets the 6threshold of this subsection (d) for the preceding 12-month 7period. If the marketplace facilitator meets the threshold for 8a 12-month period, the marketplace facilitator is considered a 9serviceman maintaining a place of business in this State and 10is required to remit the tax imposed under this Act and all 11service occupation tax imposed by local taxing jurisdictions 12in Illinois, provided such local taxes are administered by the 13Department, and to file all applicable returns for one year. 14At the end of the one-year period, the marketplace facilitator 15shall determine whether the marketplace facilitator met the 16threshold for the preceding 12-month period. If the 17marketplace facilitator met the threshold for the preceding 1812-month period, the marketplace facilitator is considered a 19serviceman maintaining a place of business in this State and 20is required to remit all applicable State and local service 21occupation taxes and file returns for the subsequent year. If 22at the end of a one-year period a marketplace facilitator that 23was required to remit the tax imposed under this Act 24determines that the marketplace facilitator did not meet the 25threshold during the preceding 12-month period, the 26marketplace facilitator shall subsequently determine on a   SB3843- 22 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1quarterly basis, ending on the last day of March, June, 2September, and December, whether he or she meets the threshold 3for the preceding 12-month period.4    (e) A marketplace facilitator shall be entitled to any 5credits, deductions, or adjustments to the sales price 6otherwise provided to the marketplace serviceman, in addition 7to any such adjustments provided directly to the marketplace 8facilitator. This Section pertains to, but is not limited to, 9adjustments such as discounts, coupons, and rebates. In 10addition, a marketplace facilitator shall be entitled to the 11vendors' discount provided in Section 9 of the Service 12Occupation Tax Act on all marketplace sales of service, and 13the marketplace serviceman shall not include sales of service 14made through a marketplace facilitator when computing any 15vendors' discount on remaining sales of service. Marketplace 16facilitators shall report and remit the applicable State and 17local service occupation taxes on sales of service facilitated 18for marketplace servicemen separately from any service 19occupation or service use tax collected on taxable sales of 20service made directly by the marketplace facilitator or its 21affiliates.22    The marketplace facilitator is liable for the remittance 23of all applicable State service occupation taxes under this 24Act and local service occupation taxes administered by the 25Department on sales of service through the marketplace and is 26subject to audit on all such sales of service. The Department   SB3843- 23 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1shall not audit marketplace servicemen for their marketplace 2sales of service where a marketplace facilitator remitted the 3applicable State and local service occupation taxes unless the 4marketplace facilitator seeks relief as a result of incorrect 5information provided to the marketplace facilitator by a 6marketplace serviceman as set forth in this Section. The 7marketplace facilitator shall not be held liable for tax on 8any sales of service made by a marketplace serviceman that 9take place outside of the marketplace and which are not a part 10of any agreement between a marketplace facilitator and a 11marketplace serviceman. In addition, marketplace facilitators 12shall not be held liable to State and local governments of 13Illinois for having charged and remitted an incorrect amount 14of State and local service occupation tax if, at the time of 15the sale of service, the tax is computed based on erroneous 16data provided by the State in database files on tax rates, 17boundaries, or taxing jurisdictions or incorrect information 18provided to the marketplace facilitator by the marketplace 19serviceman, including the marketplace serviceman's cost ratio 20and registration status.21    (f) A marketplace facilitator shall:22        (1) certify to each marketplace serviceman that the 23    marketplace facilitator assumes the rights and duties of a 24    serviceman under this Act with respect to sales of service 25    made by the marketplace serviceman through the 26    marketplace; and  SB3843- 24 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1        (2) remit taxes imposed by this Act as required by 2    this Act for sales of service made through the 3    marketplace.4    (g) A marketplace serviceman shall retain books and 5records for all sales of service made through a marketplace in 6accordance with the requirements of Section 11 of this Act.7    (h) A marketplace serviceman shall furnish to the 8marketplace facilitator information that is necessary for the 9marketplace facilitator to correctly remit taxes for a sale of 10service. Such information includes the cost price of any item 11transferred incident to a sale of service under this Act when 12the cost price of an item exceeds 50% of the total invoice 13price of a sale of service made through the marketplace. The 14information may include a certification that an item 15transferred incident to a sale of service under this Act is 16taxable, not taxable, exempt from taxation, or taxable at a 17specified rate. A marketplace serviceman shall be held 18harmless for liability for the tax imposed under this Act when 19a marketplace facilitator fails to correctly collect and remit 20tax after having been provided with information by a 21marketplace serviceman to correctly collect and remit taxes 22imposed under this Act.23    (i) If the marketplace facilitator demonstrates to the 24satisfaction of the Department that its failure to correctly 25collect and remit tax on a sale of service resulted from the 26marketplace facilitator's good faith reliance on incorrect or   SB3843- 25 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1insufficient information provided by a marketplace serviceman, 2it shall be relieved of liability for the tax on that sale of 3service and the marketplace serviceman shall be liable for any 4resulting tax due.5    (j) A marketplace facilitator is subject to audit on all 6marketplace sales of service for which it is considered to be 7the serviceman, but shall not be liable for tax or subject to 8audit on sales of service made by marketplace servicemen 9outside of the marketplace.10    (k) A marketplace facilitator required to collect taxes 11imposed under the Service Use Tax Act on marketplace sales of 12service made to Illinois purchasers shall be liable to the 13Department for such taxes, except when the marketplace 14facilitator is relieved of the duty to remit such taxes by 15virtue of having paid to the Department taxes imposed by this 16Act in accordance with this Section from such sales of 17service.18    (l) Nothing in this Section shall allow the Department to 19collect service occupation taxes from both the marketplace 20facilitator and marketplace serviceman on the same 21transaction.22    (m) If, for any reason, the Department is prohibited from 23enforcing the marketplace facilitator's duty under this Act to 24remit taxes pursuant to this Section, the duty to remit such 25taxes remains with the marketplace serviceman. 26    (n) Notwithstanding any provision of law, the following   SB3843- 26 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1provisions apply regarding a qualified delivery network sale: 2        (1) the Department may audit both the marketplace 3    seller and the delivery network company for the qualified 4    delivery network sale; and 5        (2) for qualified delivery network sales made on or 6    after the effective date of this amendatory act of the 7    104th General Assembly, a delivery network company may, in 8    the form and manner prescribed by the Department, deduct 9    or exclude from its tax liability under this Section the 10    amount of tax under this Act that the delivery network 11    company paid to the marketplace seller in connection with 12    the qualified delivery network sale. 13    The delivery network company may not claim a deduction or 14exclusion under this subsection if the marketplace seller did 15not charge the delivery network company for the tax imposed 16under this Act on the qualified network sale. The amount of the 17deduction or exclusion under this subsection may not exceed 18the amount of tax under this Act that was charged by the 19marketplace seller to the delivery network company in 20connection with the qualified delivery network sale. 21    As used in this subsection, the following terms have the 22following meanings: 23    "Bicycle" has the meaning given to that term in the 24Illinois Vehicle Code. 25    "Delivery network company" means a marketplace facilitator 26that maintains a website, mobile application, or nondigital   SB3843- 27 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1platform used to facilitate delivery services that are 2performed or otherwise conducted by a delivery network 3courier. 4    "Delivery network courier" means an individual who 5provides delivery services through a delivery network company 6by using a personal means of transportation, such as a motor 7vehicle, bicycle, scooter, or other similar mode of 8transportation, or walking. "Delivery network courier" does 9not include a common carrier or a motor carrier. 10    "Delivery services" means the pickup and delivery of 11tangible personal property by a delivery network courier from 12a marketplace seller located in this State to a customer 13located in this State, which may include the selection, 14collection, and purchase of the tangible personal property in 15connection with the delivery. "Delivery services" does not 16include a delivery requiring more than 75 miles of travel from 17the marketplace seller to the customer. 18    "Motor vehicle" has the meaning given to that term in the 19Illinois Vehicle Code. 20    "Qualified delivery network sale" means a sale that meets 21all of the following requirements: (i) the sale is made as part 22of delivery services facilitated by a delivery network 23company, (ii) the sale is sourced to this State under this Act, 24and (iii) the tax imposed by this Act on the sale is paid by 25the delivery network company to the marketplace seller in 26connection with the delivery services.   SB3843- 28 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1    (o) The imposition of the tax under this Act on tangible 2personal property transferred by lease by persons engaged in 3the business of making sales of service applies to leases in 4effect, entered into, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025. 5In the case of leases, except as otherwise provided in this 6Act, the serviceman who is a lessor must remit for each tax 7return period only the tax applicable to that part of the 8selling price actually received during such tax return period. 9(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.) 10    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 11by changing Section 2 as follows: 12    (35 ILCS 120/2)13    Sec. 2. Tax imposed. 14    (a) A tax is imposed upon persons engaged in the business 15of selling at retail, which, on and after January 1, 2025, 16includes leasing, tangible personal property, including 17computer software, and including photographs, negatives, and 18positives that are the product of photoprocessing, but not 19including products of photoprocessing produced for use in 20motion pictures for public commercial exhibition. Beginning 21January 1, 2001, prepaid telephone calling arrangements shall 22be considered tangible personal property subject to the tax 23imposed under this Act regardless of the form in which those 24arrangements may be embodied, transmitted, or fixed by any   SB3843- 29 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1method now known or hereafter developed. 2    The imposition of the tax under this Act on persons 3engaged in the business of leasing tangible personal property 4applies to leases in effect, entered into, or renewed on or 5after January 1, 2025. In the case of leases, except as 6otherwise provided in this Act, the lessor must remit, for 7each tax return period, only the tax applicable to that part of 8the selling price actually received during such tax return 9period. 10    The inclusion of leases in the tax imposed under this Act 11by Public Act 103-592 does not, however, extend to motor 12vehicles, watercraft, aircraft, and semitrailers, as defined 13in Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that are 14required to be registered with an agency of this State. The 15taxation of these items shall continue in effect as prior to 16the effective date of the changes made to this Section by 17Public Act 103-592 (i.e., dealers owe retailers' occupation 18tax, lessors owe use tax, and lessees are not subject to 19retailers' occupation or use tax). 20    Sales of (1) electricity delivered to customers by wire; 21(2) natural or artificial gas that is delivered to customers 22through pipes, pipelines, or mains; and (3) water that is 23delivered to customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains are 24not subject to tax under this Act. The provisions of Public Act 2598-583 are declaratory of existing law as to the meaning and 26scope of this Act.   SB3843- 30 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1    (b) Beginning on January 1, 2021 and through December 31, 22025, a remote retailer is engaged in the occupation of 3selling at retail in Illinois for purposes of this Act, if: 4        (1) the cumulative gross receipts from sales of 5    tangible personal property to purchasers in Illinois are 6    $100,000 or more; or 7        (2) the retailer enters into 200 or more separate 8    transactions for the sale of tangible personal property to 9    purchasers in Illinois. 10    Remote retailers that meet or exceed the threshold in 11either paragraph (1) or (2) above shall be liable for all 12applicable State retailers' and locally imposed retailers' 13occupation taxes administered by the Department on all retail 14sales to Illinois purchasers. 15    The remote retailer shall determine on a quarterly basis, 16ending on the last day of March, June, September, and 17December, whether it meets the threshold of either paragraph 18(1) or (2) of this subsection for the preceding 12-month 19period. If the retailer meets the threshold of either 20paragraph (1) or (2) for a 12-month period, he or she is 21considered a retailer maintaining a place of business in this 22State and is required to collect and remit the tax imposed 23under this Act and all retailers' occupation tax imposed by 24local taxing jurisdictions in Illinois, provided such local 25taxes are administered by the Department, and to file all 26applicable returns for one year. At the end of that one-year   SB3843- 31 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1period, the retailer shall determine whether the retailer met 2the threshold of either paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 312-month period. If the retailer met the threshold in either 4paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 12-month period, it is 5considered a retailer maintaining a place of business in this 6State and is required to collect and remit all applicable 7State and local retailers' occupation taxes and file returns 8for the subsequent year. If, at the end of a one-year period, a 9retailer that was required to collect and remit the tax 10imposed under this Act determines that it did not meet the 11threshold in either paragraph (1) or (2) during the preceding 1212-month period, then the retailer shall subsequently 13determine on a quarterly basis, ending on the last day of 14March, June, September, and December, whether the retailer met 15the threshold of either paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 1612-month period. 17    (b-1) Beginning on January 1, 2026, a remote retailer is 18engaged in the occupation of selling at retail in Illinois for 19purposes of this Act if the remote retailer's cumulative gross 20receipts from sales of tangible personal property to 21purchasers in Illinois are $100,000 or more. 22    Remote retailers that meet or exceed the threshold in this 23subsection (b-1) shall be liable for all applicable State and 24locally imposed retailers' occupation taxes administered by 25the Department on all retail sales to Illinois purchasers. 26    The remote retailer shall determine on a quarterly basis,   SB3843- 32 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1ending on the last day of March, June, September, and 2December, whether the remote retailer meets the threshold of 3this subsection (b-1) for the preceding 12-month period. If 4the remote retailer meets the threshold for a 12-month period, 5the remote retailer is considered to be engaged in the 6occupation of selling at retail in Illinois and is required to 7remit the tax imposed under this Act and all retailers' 8occupation tax imposed by local taxing jurisdictions in 9Illinois, provided such local taxes are administered by the 10Department, and to file all applicable returns for one year. 11At the end of the one-year period, the remote retailer shall 12determine whether the remote retailer met the threshold for 13the preceding 12-month period. If the retailer met the 14threshold for the preceding 12-month period, the remote 15retailer is considered to be engaged in the occupation of 16selling at retail in Illinois and is required to remit all 17applicable State and local retailers' occupation taxes and 18file returns for the subsequent year. If, at the end of a 19one-year period, a remote retailer that was required to remit 20the tax imposed under this Act determines that the remote 21retailer did not meet the threshold during the preceding 2212-month period, then the remote retailer shall subsequently 23determine on a quarterly basis, ending on the last day of 24March, June, September, and December, whether the remote 25retailer met the threshold for the preceding 12-month period. 26    (b-2) Beginning on January 1, 2025, a retailer maintaining   SB3843- 33 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1a place of business in this State that makes retail sales of 2tangible personal property to Illinois customers from a 3location or locations outside of Illinois is engaged in the 4occupation of selling at retail in Illinois for the purposes 5of this Act. Those retailers are liable for all applicable 6State and locally imposed retailers' occupation taxes 7administered by the Department on retail sales made by those 8retailers to Illinois customers from locations outside of 9Illinois. 10    (b-5) For the purposes of this Section, neither the gross 11receipts from nor, until January 1, 2026, the number of 12separate transactions for sales of tangible personal property 13to purchasers in Illinois that a remote retailer makes through 14a marketplace facilitator shall be included for the purposes 15of determining whether he or she has met the thresholds of 16subsection (b) or (b-1) of this Section so long as the remote 17retailer has received certification from the marketplace 18facilitator that the marketplace facilitator is legally 19responsible for payment of tax on such sales. 20    (b-10) A remote retailer that is required to collect taxes 21imposed under the Use Tax Act on retail sales made to Illinois 22purchasers or a retailer maintaining a place of business in 23this State that is required to collect taxes imposed under the 24Use Tax Act on retail sales made to Illinois purchasers shall 25be liable to the Department for such taxes, except when the 26remote retailer or retailer maintaining a place of business in   SB3843- 34 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1this State is relieved of the duty to remit such taxes by 2virtue of having paid to the Department taxes imposed by this 3Act in accordance with this Section upon his or her gross 4receipts from such sales. 5    (c) Marketplace facilitators engaged in the business of 6selling at retail tangible personal property in Illinois. 7Beginning January 1, 2021 and through December 31, 2025, a 8marketplace facilitator is engaged in the occupation of 9selling at retail tangible personal property in Illinois for 10purposes of this Act if, during the previous 12-month period: 11        (1) the cumulative gross receipts from sales of 12    tangible personal property on its own behalf or on behalf 13    of marketplace sellers to purchasers in Illinois equals 14    $100,000 or more; or 15        (2) the marketplace facilitator enters into 200 or 16    more separate transactions on its own behalf or on behalf 17    of marketplace sellers for the sale of tangible personal 18    property to purchasers in Illinois, regardless of whether 19    the marketplace facilitator or marketplace sellers for 20    whom such sales are facilitated are registered as 21    retailers in this State. 22    A marketplace facilitator who meets either paragraph (1) 23or (2) of this subsection is required to remit the applicable 24State retailers' occupation taxes under this Act and local 25retailers' occupation taxes administered by the Department on 26all taxable sales of tangible personal property made by the   SB3843- 35 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1marketplace facilitator or facilitated for marketplace sellers 2to customers in this State. A marketplace facilitator selling 3or facilitating the sale of tangible personal property to 4customers in this State is subject to all applicable 5procedures and requirements of this Act. 6    The marketplace facilitator shall determine on a quarterly 7basis, ending on the last day of March, June, September, and 8December, whether it meets the threshold of either paragraph 9(1) or (2) of this subsection for the preceding 12-month 10period. If the marketplace facilitator meets the threshold of 11either paragraph (1) or (2) for a 12-month period, the 12marketplace facilitator is considered a retailer maintaining a 13place of business in this State and is required to remit the 14tax imposed under this Act and all retailers' occupation tax 15imposed by local taxing jurisdictions in Illinois, provided 16such local taxes are administered by the Department, and to 17file all applicable returns for one year. At the end of that 18one-year period, the marketplace facilitator shall determine 19whether it met the threshold of either paragraph (1) or (2) for 20the preceding 12-month period. If the marketplace facilitator 21met the threshold in either paragraph (1) or (2) for the 22preceding 12-month period, it is considered a retailer 23maintaining a place of business in this State and is required 24to collect and remit all applicable State and local retailers' 25occupation taxes and file returns for the subsequent year. If 26at the end of a one-year period a marketplace facilitator that   SB3843- 36 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1was required to collect and remit the tax imposed under this 2Act determines that it did not meet the threshold in either 3paragraph (1) or (2) during the preceding 12-month period, the 4marketplace facilitator shall subsequently determine on a 5quarterly basis, ending on the last day of March, June, 6September, and December, whether it met the threshold of 7either paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 12-month period. 8    (c-5) Beginning January 1, 2026, a marketplace facilitator 9is engaged in the occupation of selling at retail tangible 10personal property in Illinois for purposes of this Act if, 11during the previous 12-month period the cumulative gross 12receipts from sales of tangible personal property on its own 13behalf or on behalf of marketplace sellers to purchasers in 14Illinois equals $100,000 or more. 15    A marketplace facilitator who meets the threshold of this 16subsection is required to remit the applicable State 17retailers' occupation taxes under this Act and local 18retailers' occupation taxes administered by the Department on 19all taxable sales of tangible personal property made by the 20marketplace facilitator or facilitated for marketplace sellers 21to customers in this State. A marketplace facilitator selling 22or facilitating the sale of tangible personal property to 23customers in this State is subject to all applicable 24procedures and requirements of this Act. 25    The marketplace facilitator shall determine on a quarterly 26basis, ending on the last day of March, June, September, and   SB3843- 37 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1December, whether the marketplace facilitator meets the 2threshold of this subsection (c-5) for the preceding 12-month 3period. If the marketplace facilitator meets the threshold for 4a 12-month period, the marketplace facilitator is considered 5to be engaged in the occupation of selling at retail in 6Illinois and is required to remit the tax imposed under this 7Act and all retailers' occupation tax imposed by local taxing 8jurisdictions in Illinois, provided such local taxes are 9administered by the Department, and to file all applicable 10returns for one year. At the end of the one-year period, the 11marketplace facilitator shall determine whether the 12marketplace facilitator met the threshold for the preceding 1312-month period. If the marketplace facilitator met the 14threshold for the preceding 12-month period, the marketplace 15facilitator is considered to be engaged in the occupation of 16selling at retail in Illinois and is required to collect and 17remit all applicable State and local retailers' occupation 18taxes and file returns for the subsequent year. If at the end 19of a one-year period a marketplace facilitator that was 20required to collect and remit the tax imposed under this Act 21determines that the marketplace facilitator did not meet the 22threshold during the preceding 12-month period, the 23marketplace facilitator shall subsequently determine on a 24quarterly basis, ending on the last day of March, June, 25September, and December, whether it met the threshold for the 26preceding 12-month period.   SB3843- 38 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1    (c-10) A marketplace facilitator shall be entitled to any 2credits, deductions, or adjustments to the sales price 3otherwise provided to the marketplace seller, in addition to 4any such adjustments provided directly to the marketplace 5facilitator. This Section pertains to, but is not limited to, 6adjustments such as discounts, coupons, and rebates. In 7addition, a marketplace facilitator shall be entitled to the 8retailers' discount provided in Section 3 of the Retailers' 9Occupation Tax Act on all marketplace sales, and the 10marketplace seller shall not include sales made through a 11marketplace facilitator when computing any retailers' discount 12on remaining sales. Marketplace facilitators shall report and 13remit the applicable State and local retailers' occupation 14taxes on sales facilitated for marketplace sellers separately 15from any sales or use tax collected on taxable retail sales 16made directly by the marketplace facilitator or its 17affiliates. 18    The marketplace facilitator is liable for the remittance 19of all applicable State retailers' occupation taxes under this 20Act and local retailers' occupation taxes administered by the 21Department on sales through the marketplace and is subject to 22audit on all such sales. The Department shall not audit 23marketplace sellers for their marketplace sales where a 24marketplace facilitator remitted the applicable State and 25local retailers' occupation taxes unless the marketplace 26facilitator seeks relief as a result of incorrect information   SB3843- 39 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1provided to the marketplace facilitator by a marketplace 2seller as set forth in this Section. The marketplace 3facilitator shall not be held liable for tax on any sales made 4by a marketplace seller that take place outside of the 5marketplace and which are not a part of any agreement between a 6marketplace facilitator and a marketplace seller. In addition, 7marketplace facilitators shall not be held liable to State and 8local governments of Illinois for having charged and remitted 9an incorrect amount of State and local retailers' occupation 10tax if, at the time of the sale, the tax is computed based on 11erroneous data provided by the State in database files on tax 12rates, boundaries, or taxing jurisdictions or incorrect 13information provided to the marketplace facilitator by the 14marketplace seller. 15    (d) A marketplace facilitator shall: 16        (1) certify to each marketplace seller that the 17    marketplace facilitator assumes the rights and duties of a 18    retailer under this Act with respect to sales made by the 19    marketplace seller through the marketplace; and 20        (2) remit taxes imposed by this Act as required by 21    this Act for sales made through the marketplace. 22    (e) A marketplace seller shall retain books and records 23for all sales made through a marketplace in accordance with 24the requirements of this Act. 25    (f) A marketplace facilitator is subject to audit on all 26marketplace sales for which it is considered to be the   SB3843- 40 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1retailer, but shall not be liable for tax or subject to audit 2on sales made by marketplace sellers outside of the 3marketplace. 4    (g) A marketplace facilitator required to collect taxes 5imposed under the Use Tax Act on marketplace sales made to 6Illinois purchasers shall be liable to the Department for such 7taxes, except when the marketplace facilitator is relieved of 8the duty to remit such taxes by virtue of having paid to the 9Department taxes imposed by this Act in accordance with this 10Section upon his or her gross receipts from such sales. 11    (h) Nothing in this Section shall allow the Department to 12collect retailers' occupation taxes from both the marketplace 13facilitator and marketplace seller on the same transaction. 14    (i) If, for any reason, the Department is prohibited from 15enforcing the marketplace facilitator's duty under this Act to 16remit taxes pursuant to this Section, the duty to remit such 17taxes remains with the marketplace seller. 18    (j) (Blank). 19    (k) (Blank). 20    (l) A marketplace seller shall furnish to the marketplace 21facilitator information that is necessary for the marketplace 22facilitator to correctly remit taxes for a retail sale. The 23information may include a certification that an item being 24sold is taxable, not taxable, exempt from taxation, or taxable 25at a specified rate. A marketplace seller shall be held 26harmless for liability for the tax imposed under this Act when   SB3843- 41 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1a marketplace facilitator fails to correctly remit tax after 2having been provided with information by a marketplace seller 3to correctly remit taxes imposed under this Act.4    (m) If the marketplace facilitator demonstrates to the 5satisfaction of the Department that its failure to correctly 6remit tax on a retail sale resulted from the marketplace 7facilitator's good faith reliance on incorrect or insufficient 8information provided by a marketplace seller, it shall be 9relieved of liability for the tax on that retail sale and the 10marketplace seller shall be liable for any resulting tax due. 11    (n) Notwithstanding any provision of law, the following 12provisions apply regarding a qualified delivery network sale: 13        (1) the Department may audit both the marketplace 14    seller and the delivery network company for the qualified 15    delivery network sale; and 16        (2) for qualified delivery network sales made on or 17    after the effective date of this amendatory act of the 18    104th General Assembly, a delivery network company may, in 19    the form and manner prescribed by the Department, deduct 20    or exclude from its tax liability under this Section the 21    amount of tax under this Act that the delivery network 22    company paid to the marketplace seller in connection with 23    the qualified delivery network sale. 24    The delivery network company may not claim a deduction or 25exclusion under this subsection if the marketplace seller did 26not charge the delivery network company for the tax imposed   SB3843- 42 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1under this Act on the qualified network sale. The amount of the 2deduction or exclusion under this subsection may not exceed 3the amount of tax under this Act that was charged by the 4marketplace seller to the delivery network company in 5connection with the qualified delivery network sale. 6    As used in this subsection, the following terms have the 7following meanings: 8    "Bicycle" has the meaning given to that term in the 9Illinois Vehicle Code. 10    "Delivery network company" means a marketplace facilitator 11that maintains a website, mobile application, or nondigital 12platform used to facilitate delivery services that are 13performed or otherwise conducted by a delivery network 14courier. 15    "Delivery network courier" means an individual who 16provides delivery services through a delivery network company 17by using a personal means of transportation, such as a motor 18vehicle, bicycle, scooter, or other similar mode of 19transportation, or walking. "Delivery network courier" does 20not include a common carrier or a motor carrier. 21    "Delivery services" means the pickup and delivery of 22tangible personal property by a delivery network courier from 23a marketplace seller located in this State to a customer 24located in this State, which may include the selection, 25collection, and purchase of the tangible personal property in 26connection with the delivery. "Delivery services" does not   SB3843- 43 -LRB104 18877 HLH 32322 b1include a delivery requiring more than 75 miles of travel from 2the marketplace seller to the customer. 3    "Motor vehicle" has the meaning given to that term in the 4Illinois Vehicle Code. 5    "Qualified delivery network sale" means a sale that meets 6all of the following requirements: (i) the sale is made as part 7of delivery services facilitated by a delivery network 8company, (ii) the sale is sourced to this State under this Act, 9and (iii) the tax imposed by this Act on the sale is paid by 10the delivery network company to the marketplace seller in 11connection with the delivery services. 12(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-983, eff. 1-1-25; 13104-6, eff. 6-16-25.)